src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k51_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    luður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: luður
    luður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: lunn
    luður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: lunni
    luður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: luns
    luður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: lunnar
    luður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: lunnar
    luður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: lunnum
    luður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: lunna
    luður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: luðurin
    luður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: lunnin
    luður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: lunninum
    luður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: lunsins
    luður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: lunnarnir
    luður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: lunnarnar
    luður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: lunnunum
    luður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: lunnanna
